Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5492YH (2) 91 ms/js H.F. 2386 Section 1. Section 414.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. (1) A city may require the first 3 purchaser of a single-family residential home in a new housing 4 development to physically occupy the home for one year after 5 the purchase of the home. 6 (2) The city may charge the owner of a single-family 7 residential home a fine for a violation of subparagraph (1). 8 The fine may not be greater than one-fourth of the fair market 9 value of the home. 10 (3) A city ordinance adopted under this section shall 11 include an exemption allowing the owner to sell or transfer 12 the property within the one-year occupancy period of required 13 occupancy if the sale is a good-faith sale. 14 (4) For purposes of this paragraph: 15 (a) âNew housing developmentâ means any housing that is 16 being sold for the first time on the market including housing 17 that is newly constructed as part of a development agreement 18 between the city and a developer. 19 (b) âOccupyâ means to physically reside in and use a 20 property as a home, residence, or sleeping space. 21